Utah statutes.
38-1a-307.   Contesting certain notices.

(1)  A contesting person who believes that a contestable notice lacks proper basis and is therefore invalid may request from the person who filed the notice evidence establishing the validity of the notice.

(2)  Within 10 days after receiving a request under Subsection (1), the person who filed the contestable notice shall provide the requesting person evidence that the notice is valid.

(3)  If the person who filed the notice does not provide timely evidence of the validity of the contestable notice, the person who filed the notice shall immediately cancel the notice from the registry in the manner prescribed by the division by rule.

